Maryland, session 2026, HB1172.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article 14 – Howard County
26.102.
(b) [(1)] The Board shall have 13 voting members appointed by the County
Executive with the approval of the County Council.
[(2) The Chairman of the Mid–Maryland Private Industry Council shall
designate a Howard County private sector representative from the Council to be an ex
officio nonvoting member.]
(g) (1) Seven members of the Board[, excluding the ex officio nonvoting
member] constitute a quorum for the purpose of conducting business.
(2) The affirmative vote of at least seven members is required before the
Board may take action.
(3) The Board shall meet at least once [each] EVERY OTHER month at the
times and places that it determines and more often at the call of the chair.
26.103.
– 1 –

Ch. 579 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) (1) Subject to the approval of the Board, the County Executive shall
nominate one or more candidates for Executive Director, who shall be the Chief
[Administrative] EXECUTIVE Officer of the Authority.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 2 –